Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,120
Immune, defined.

Immune shall mean that neither a civil action nor a criminal prosecution may arise from any action taken pursuant to sections 81-5,115 to 81-5,131 when actual malice on the part of an insurance company or authorized agency against the insured is not present.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 6.